Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.905

Validity of registration under prior laws.

A degree-granting institution registered under chapter 188, Laws of 1979, as amended, as of June 30, 1986, is not required to apply for authorization under chapter 28B.85 RCW until the expiration date of such registration.

[ 1986 c 136 s 22.]